Illinois, session 104th, HB4925.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-1517 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-1517)7    Sec. 11-1517. Low-speed electric bicycles.8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 9provisions of this Chapter that apply to bicycles also apply 10to low-speed electric bicycles.11    (b) Each low-speed electric bicycle operating in this 12State shall comply with equipment and manufacturing 13requirements adopted by the United States Consumer Product 14Safety Commission under 16 CFR 1512. Each Class 3 low-speed 15electric bicycle shall be equipped with a speedometer that 16displays the speed the bicycle is traveling in miles per hour.17    (c) Beginning on or after January 1, 2018, every 18manufacturer and distributor of low-speed electric bicycles 19shall apply a label that is permanently affixed to the bicycle 20in a prominent location. The label shall contain, in Arial 21font in at least 9-point type:22        (1) a classification number for the bicycle that 23    corresponds with a class under Section 1-140.10 of this   HB4925- 2 -LRB104 20523 LNS 33997 b1    Code;2        (2) the bicycle's top assisted speed; and3        (3) the bicycle's motor wattage.4    No person shall knowingly tamper or modify the speed 5capability or engagement of a low-speed electric bicycle 6without replacing the label required under this subsection 7(c).8    (d) A Class 2 low-speed electric bicycle shall operate in 9a manner so that the electric motor is disengaged or ceases to 10function when the brakes are applied. A Class 1 low-speed 11electric bicycle and a Class 3 low-speed electric bicycle 12shall operate in a manner so that the electric motor is 13disengaged or ceases to function when the rider stops 14pedaling. 15    (e) A person may operate a low-speed electric bicycle upon 16any highway, street, or roadway authorized for use by 17bicycles, including, but not limited to, bicycle lanes.18    (f) A person may operate a low-speed electric bicycle upon 19any bicycle path unless the municipality, county, or local 20authority with jurisdiction prohibits the use of low-speed 21electric bicycles or a specific class of low-speed electric 22bicycles on that path.23    (g) A person may not operate a low-speed electric bicycle 24on a sidewalk.25    (h) A person may operate a Class 3 low-speed electric 26bicycle only if he or she is 16 years of age or older. A person   HB4925- 3 -LRB104 20523 LNS 33997 b1who is less than 16 years of age may ride as a passenger on a 2Class 3 low-speed electric bicycle that is designed to 3accommodate passengers if the operator is 18 years of age or 4older.5(Source: P.A. 100-209, eff. 1-1-18.)